South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S538.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-37-220(B)(14) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (14)(a) all farm buildings and agricultural structures owned by a producer in this State used to house livestock, poultry, crops, farm equipment, or farm supplies and all farm machinery and equipment including self-propelled farm machinery and equipment except for motor vehicles licensed for use on the highways.  For the purpose of this section "self-propelled farm machinery and equipment" means farm machinery or equipment which contains within itself the means for its own locomotion. For purposes of this item, farm equipment includes greenhouses; (b) farm buildings and structures qualifying for the exemption allowed pursuant to subitem (a) must be located on property that meets the requirements set forth in Sections 12-43-220(d), 12-43-230, and 12-43-232 and must be receiving the agricultural exemption provided for in Section 12-43-220(d)(1); SECTION 2.  Section 12-43-220 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (h) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a taxpayer may apply for a refund of property taxes overpaid because the property was eligible for the agricultural assessment ratio. The application must be made in accordance with Section 12-60-2560. The taxpayer must establish that the property in question was in fact used for agricultural purposes. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----